src/fst/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX-WEAKEN
+Sg+Abe+PxSg2:%>dtaa K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxSg2:%>dtää K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxSg3:%>staa K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxSg3:%>stää K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxPl2:%>dtaa K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxPl2:%>dtää K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxPl3:%>ztaa K ;
+Sg+Abe+PxPl3:%>ztää K ;

+Sg+Acc+PxSg2:%>d K ;
+Sg+Acc+PxSg3:%>s K ;
+Sg+Acc+PxPl2:%>d K ;
+Sg+Acc+PxPl3:%>z K ;

+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>d K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>s K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl2:%>d K ;
+Sg+Gen+PxPl3:%>z K ;

+Sg+Gen+PxSg2:%>d ASSOC-COLL_IQ33E ;
+Sg+Gen+PxSg3:%>s ASSOC-COLL_IQ33E ;

+Sg+Com+PxSg1:%>inan K ;
+Sg+Com+PxSg2:%>inad K ;
+Sg+Com+PxSg3:%>ines K ;
+Sg+Com+PxPl1:%>ineen K ;
+Sg+Com+PxPl2:%>ineed K ;
+Sg+Com+PxPl3:%>ineez K ;

+Pl+Abe+PxSg1:%^UltRmVow%>ääntaa K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxSg1:%^UltRmVow%>ääntää K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxSg2:%^UltRmVow%>äädtaa K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxSg2:%^UltRmVow%>äädtää K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxSg3:%^UltRmVow%>eestaa K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxSg3:%^UltRmVow%>eestää K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxPl1:%^UltRmVow%>eentaa K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxPl1:%^UltRmVow%>eentää K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxPl2:%^UltRmVow%>eedtaa K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxPl2:%^UltRmVow%>eedtää K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxPl3:%^UltRmVow%>eeztaa K ;
+Pl+Abe+PxPl3:%^UltRmVow%>eeztää K ;

+Pl+Acc+PxSg1:%^UltRmVow%>ään K ;
+Pl+Acc+PxSg2:%^UltRmVow%>ääd K ;
+Pl+Acc+PxSg3:%^UltRmVow%>ees K ;
+Pl+Acc+PxPl1:%^UltRmVow%>een K ;
+Pl+Acc+PxPl2:%^UltRmVow%>eed K ;
+Pl+Acc+PxPl3:%^UltRmVow%>eez K ;

+Pl+Com+PxSg1:%^UltRmVow%>äänvuiʹm K ;
+Pl+Com+PxSg2:%^UltRmVow%>äädvuiʹm K ;
+Pl+Com+PxSg3:%^UltRmVow%>eesvuiʹm K ;
+Pl+Com+PxPl1:%^UltRmVow%>eenvuiʹm K ;
+Pl+Com+PxPl2:%^UltRmVow%>eedvuiʹm K ;
+Pl+Com+PxPl3:%^UltRmVow%>eezvuiʹm K ;

+Pl+Gen+PxSg1:%^UltRmVow%>ään K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg2:%^UltRmVow%>ääd K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxSg3:%^UltRmVow%>ees K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl1:%^UltRmVow%>een K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl2:%^UltRmVow%>eed K ;
+Pl+Gen+PxPl3:%^UltRmVow%>eez K ;

+Pl+Ill+PxSg1:%^UltRmVow%>ään K ;
+Pl+Ill+PxSg2:%^UltRmVow%>ääd K ;
+Pl+Ill+PxSg3:%^UltRmVow%>ees K ;
+Pl+Ill+PxPl1:%^UltRmVow%>een K ;
+Pl+Ill+PxPl2:%^UltRmVow%>eed K ;
+Pl+Ill+PxPl3:%^UltRmVow%>eez K ;

+Pl+Loc+PxSg1:%>inan K ;
+Pl+Loc+PxSg2:%>inad K ;
+Pl+Loc+PxSg3:%>ines K ;
+Pl+Loc+PxPl1:%>ineen K ;
+Pl+Loc+PxPl2:%>ineed K ;
+Pl+Loc+PxPl3:%>ineez K ;

+Pl+Nom+PxSg2:%>d K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxSg3:%>s K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl2:%>d K ;
+Pl+Nom+PxPl3:%>z K ;

LEXICON VOWEL-FINAL-STEM-PX-STRENGTHEN
+Ess+PxSg1:%>nan K ;
+Ess+PxSg2:%>nad K ;
+Ess+PxSg3:%>nes K ;
+Ess+PxPl1:%>neen K ;
+Ess+PxPl2:%>need K ;
+Ess+PxPl3:%>neez K ;

+Sg+Ill+PxSg1:%>san K ;
+Sg+Ill+PxSg2:%>sad K ;
+Sg+Ill+PxSg3:%>ses K ;
+Sg+Ill+PxPl1:%>seen K ;
+Sg+Ill+PxPl2:%>seed K ;
+Sg+Ill+PxPl3:%>seez K ;
